Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Shareholders and Records.

Sec. 10.06.405.
Meetings of shareholders.

Meetings of shareholders shall be held at a place inside or outside the state, by remote communication, or at a place inside or outside the state and by remote communication, as provided in the bylaws. In the absence of a provision in the bylaws, meetings shall be held at the direction of the board or at the registered office of the corporation.

An annual meeting of the shareholders shall be held at the time as provided in the bylaws or, if the bylaws do not set a time, at a time determined by the board. If the annual meeting is not held within any 13-month period, the superior court may on the application of a shareholder summarily order a meeting to be held.

Special meetings of the shareholders may be called by the board, the chair of the board, the president, the holders of not less than one-tenth of all the shares entitled to vote at the meeting, or other persons as may be authorized in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

The failure of a corporation to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed under its bylaws does not cause the corporation to forfeit its status, does not cause a dissolution of the corporation, and does not affect the validity of corporate action.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 12 ch 22 SLA 2015; am §§ 3, 4 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, substituted “chair” for “chairman” in (c).

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (a),
in the first sentence, substituted “the state, by remote communication, or at a place inside or outside the state and by remote communication,” for “this state” following “inside or outside”, in the second sentence, inserted “direction of the board or at the” following “held at the”;
in (b), added “or, if the bylaws do not set a time, at a time determined by the board” at the end of the first sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendments to (a) and (b) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.408.
Closing of transfer books and fixing record date.

To determine the shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders or an adjournment of a meeting, to determine the shareholders entitled to receive payment of a dividend, or to determine the shareholders for any other proper purpose, the board of a corporation may provide that the stock transfer books shall be closed for a stated period not exceeding 70 days. If the stock transfer books are closed to determine shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders, they shall be closed for at least 20 days immediately preceding the meeting.

Instead of closing the stock transfer books, the bylaws or, in the absence of an applicable bylaw, the board may fix a date as the record date for the determination of shareholders. This record date may not be more than 60 days and, in case of a meeting of shareholders, not less than 20 days before the date on which the particular action requiring the determination of shareholders is to be taken. If the stock transfer books are not closed and a record date is not fixed for the determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of shareholders or for the determination of shareholders entitled to receive payment of a dividend, the date on which notice of the meeting is mailed or the date on which the resolution of the board declaring the dividend is adopted, is the record date for the determination of shareholders. When a determination of shareholders entitled to vote at a meeting of shareholders has been made as provided in this section, the determination applies to an adjournment of the meeting of shareholders.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, deleted “or” after “of a meeting,” in (a).

Sec. 10.06.410.
Notice of shareholders’ meetings.

Written or printed notice stating the place, if the meeting will be held at a designated place, the manner, including holding the meeting by remote communication, the day, and the hour of the meeting, and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than 20 or more than 60 days before the date of the meeting, either personally, by mail, or by electronic transmission under (b) of this section, by or at the direction of the president, the secretary, the officer, or persons calling the meeting, to each shareholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting. If mailed, the notice is considered delivered when deposited with postage prepaid in the United States mail addressed to the shareholder at the address of the shareholder as it appears on the stock transfer books of the corporation, or, if the shareholder has filed with the secretary of the corporation a written request that notice be mailed to a different address, addressed to the shareholder at the new address. An affidavit of the secretary or other person giving the notice or of a transfer agent of the corporation that the notice required by this section has been given is prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit. If attendance of the meeting by remote communication is permitted, the notice must state the method of remote communication by which a shareholder or a proxy holder is considered present in person at the meeting and by which the shareholder or proxy holder may vote.

Notice under (a) of this section may be given by electronic transmission if the shareholder authorizes delivery by electronic transmission. Authorization must be in the form of a writing signed by the shareholder or an electronic transmission that sets out or is submitted with information demonstrating that the shareholder authorized the electronic transmission. An affidavit of the secretary or an assistant secretary or of the transfer agent or other agent of the corporation that the notice has been given by a form of electronic transmission shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated in the affidavit. Notice by electronic transmission shall be considered given

by facsimile telecommunication when directed to a number at which the shareholder has consented to receive notice;

by electronic mail when directed to an electronic mail address at which the shareholder has consented to receive notice;

by a posting on an electronic network together with a separate notice of the specific posting to the shareholder on the later of

the posting; or

the giving of separate notice; or

by any other form of electronic transmission when directed to the shareholder.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 18 ch 82 SLA 1989; am §§ 1, 2 ch 103 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “if the meeting will be held at a designated place, the manner, including holding the meeting by remote communication, the day, and the hour” for “day, and hour” following “stating the place,”, added the last sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Editor’s notes.

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.411.
Delivery of information and items to shareholders.

A corporation shall be considered to have delivered an annual report, proxy statement, or other information to shareholders of record who reside at the same physical location and share an address if the corporation delivers an annual report, proxy statement, or other information to the shared address; the corporation addresses the annual report, proxy statement, or other information to the shareholders as a group (for example, “ABC Corporation Shareholders,” “Jane Doe and Household,” or “the Smith Family”) or to each of the shareholders individually (for example, “John Doe and Richard Jones”); and

each shareholder consents in writing to delivery of one copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information to the shareholder’s shared address, and the corporation has notified each shareholder of the duration of that shareholder’s consent, explained how the shareholder can revoke the consent, and explained that the corporation will begin sending an individual copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information to the shareholder within 30 days after revocation of the shareholder’s consent; or

all of the following conditions are met:

the shareholder has the same last name as the other shareholders at the shared address or the corporation reasonably believes that the shareholders are members of the same family;

the corporation has sent the shareholder a notice at least 60 days before the corporation begins to rely on this section concerning delivery of annual reports, proxy statements, or other information to that shareholder; the notice must

state that only one copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information will be delivered to the shared address unless the corporation receives contrary instructions from the shareholder;

include a toll-free telephone number or be accompanied by a reply form that is pre-addressed with postage provided that the shareholder can use to notify the corporation that the shareholder wishes to receive a separate copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information;

state that the corporation will begin sending individual copies to a shareholder within 30 days after the shareholder notifies the corporation that the shareholder wishes to receive a separate copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information; and

include the following statement or a similar clear and understandable statement in boldface type within the text of the notice or on the envelope containing the notice, or, in the case of a notice mailed with other shareholder communications, both within the text of the notice and on the envelope containing the notice: “Important Notice Regarding Delivery of Shareholder Documents”;

the corporation has not received notice from the shareholder indicating that the shareholder wishes to continue to receive an individual copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information; and

the corporation delivers the annual report, proxy statement, or other information to a post office box or to a residential street address; the corporation may assume a street address is a residential street address unless the corporation has information that indicates that the address is a business address.

If a shareholder revokes consent to delivery of one copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information to a shared address or notifies the corporation that the shareholder wishes to receive an individual copy of the annual report, proxy statement, or other information, the corporation shall begin sending individual copies to that shareholder within 30 days after the corporation receives the revocation of consent or notice.

A corporation is not required to send a notice of a shareholders’ meeting, an annual report, a payment, a notice of a payment, or a proxy statement to a shareholder until the shareholder provides the corporation with written notice of the shareholder’s current address if materials set out in (1) or (2) of this subsection have been sent by first class mail to the shareholder’s address and have been returned as undeliverable:

an annual report and proxy statements for two consecutive annual shareholders’ meetings;

during a period of at least 12 months, at least two payments of dividends or interest on securities, or at least two dividend reinvestment confirmations.

For purposes of (a) of this section, “address” means a street address, a post office box number, an electronic mail address, a facsimile telephone number, or another similar destination to which paper or electronic documents are delivered, unless otherwise provided in this section. If the corporation has reason to believe that the address is a street address of a multi-unit building, the address must include the unit number.

History.

(§ 3 ch 103 SLA 2002)

Sec. 10.06.413.
Voting list; liability.

At least 20 days before each meeting of shareholders, the officer or agent having charge of the stock transfer books for shares of a corporation shall make a list of the shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting or an adjournment of the meeting arranged in alphabetical order, with the address of and the number of shares held by each shareholder. The list shall be kept on file at the registered office of the corporation and is subject to inspection by a shareholder or the agent or attorney of a shareholder at any time during usual business hours for a period of 20 days before the meeting. The list shall also be produced and kept open at the time and place of the meeting and subject to the inspection of a shareholder during the meeting, or the list shall be kept available for the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network where the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting. If the corporation makes the list available on an electronic network, the corporation may take reasonable steps to ensure that the information is available only to shareholders of the corporation. The original stock transfer books are prima facie evidence as to the shareholders who are entitled to examine the list or transfer books or to vote at a meeting of shareholders.

Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does not affect the validity of the action taken at the meeting.

An officer or agent having charge of the stock transfer books who fails to prepare the list of shareholders, keep it on file for a period of 20 days, or produce and keep it open for inspection at the meeting, as provided in this section, is liable for a penalty of $5,000 and shall pay this sum to a shareholder who makes a written request for performance of the duties imposed by this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (a), at the end of the third sentence, added “, or the list shall be kept available for the meeting on a reasonably accessible electronic network where the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting”, added the fourth sentence, and made a stylistic change.

Editor’s notes.

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.415.
Quorum of shareholders.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a majority of the shares entitled to vote, represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, constitutes a quorum at a meeting of shareholders, but in no event may a quorum consist of less than one-third of the shares entitled to vote at the meeting. If a quorum is present, the affirmative vote of the majority of shares represented at the meeting and entitled to vote on the subject matter is the act of the shareholders, unless the vote of a greater number or voting by classes is required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws.

Shareholders present at a meeting at which a quorum is present may continue to transact business until adjournment, notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough shareholders to leave less than a quorum, if any action taken other than adjournment is approved by at least a majority of shares required to constitute a quorum.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 7 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a), inserted “, by remote communication,” following “represented in person”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (a) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.418.
Proxies.

Each person entitled to vote shares may authorize another person or persons to act by proxy with respect to the shares. A proxy purporting to be executed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is presumed valid.

A proxy is not valid after the expiration of 11 months from the date of the proxy unless it qualifies as an irrevocable proxy under (e) of this section. A proxy continues in full force and effect until revoked by the person executing it, except as provided in this section. A person may revoke a proxy by a writing delivered to the corporation stating that the proxy is revoked, by a subsequent proxy executed by the person executing the prior proxy and delivered to the corporation, or by attendance at the meeting and voting in person, or by remote communication, by the person executing the proxy. The dates contained on the forms of proxy presumptively determine the order of execution, regardless of the postmark dates on the envelopes in which the proxies are mailed.

A proxy is not revoked by the death or incapacity of the maker unless, before the vote is counted, written notice of the death or incapacity is received by the corporation.

Except as provided otherwise by written agreement of the parties, the record holder of shares held by a person as pledgee or otherwise as security or that belong to another shall, upon demand and payment of necessary expenses, issue a proxy to vote to the pledgor or to the owner of the shares.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, a proxy that states that it is irrevocable is irrevocable for the period specified in the proxy when it is held by the following or a nominee of the following:

a person to whom the shares are pledged for the performance of an obligation or the payment of a debt;

a person who has purchased, agreed to purchase, or holds an option to purchase the shares or a person who has sold a portion of the shares of the person in the corporation to the maker of the proxy;

a person who has contracted to perform services as an employee of the corporation, if a proxy is required by the contract of employment and if the proxy states that it was given in consideration of the contract of employment, the name of the employee, and the period of employment contracted for;

a person designated by or under an agreement under AS

10.06.425

; or

a beneficiary of a trust with respect to shares held by the trust.

Notwithstanding the period of irrevocability specified in a proxy, the proxy becomes revocable when the pledge is redeemed, the option or agreement to purchase is terminated or the seller no longer owns any shares of the corporation or dies, the period of employment provided for in the contract of employment has terminated, the agreement under AS

10.06.425

has terminated, or the person ceases to be a beneficiary of the trust. In addition, a proxy may be made irrevocable if it is given to secure the performance of a duty or to protect a title, either legal or equitable, until the happening of events that, by its terms, discharge the obligations secured by it.

Notwithstanding a provision in a proxy that makes the proxy irrevocable, a proxy is revoked when the shares are transferred unless the transferee knows about the provision or the proxy, or the irrevocability or notice of the proxy appears on a certificate representing the shares.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 19 — 22 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 8 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in the third sentence of (b), inserted “, or by remote communication,” following “voting in person”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendment to (b) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.420.
Voting of shares.

An outstanding share, regardless of class, is entitled to one vote on each matter submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders, except as may be otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation. If the articles provide for more or less than one vote for any share, on any matter, every reference in this chapter to a majority or other proportion of shares shall refer to a majority or other proportion of the votes entitled to be cast.

Shares held by the corporation, or shares held by another corporation if a majority of the shares entitled to vote for the election of directors of the other corporation is held by the corporation, may not be voted at a meeting or counted in determining the total number of outstanding shares at a given time.

A shareholder may vote in person, by remote communication, by proxy executed in writing by the shareholder or by the authorized attorney-in-fact of the shareholder, or by proxy executed by electronic transmission by the shareholder or by the authorized attorney-in-fact of the shareholder. A proxy executed by electronic transmission must

be directed to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization, or similar agent that is authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive the transmission; and

include information that demonstrates that the shareholder authorized the transmission.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, at an election for directors, each shareholder entitled to vote at the election may vote, in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, the number of shares owned by the shareholder for as many persons as there are directors to be elected and for whose election the shareholder has a right to vote, or to cumulate votes by giving one candidate votes equal to the number of directors multiplied by the number of shares of the shareholder, or by distributing votes on the same principle among any number of candidates. The rights created by this subsection may not be limited by amendment to the articles when the votes cast against the amendment would be sufficient to elect one director if voted cumulatively at an election of the entire board.

Except as prohibited in this subsection, shares standing in the name of another corporation may be voted by the officer, agent, or proxy as the bylaws of the other corporation may prescribe, or, in the absence of a provision, as the board of the other corporation may determine. The shares of a corporation may not be voted if they are owned, directly or indirectly, by a second corporation, domestic or foreign, and the first corporation owns, directly or indirectly, a majority of the shares entitled to vote for the directors of the second corporation.

Shares held by an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator may be voted by that person, in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, without a transfer of the shares into the name of that person. Shares standing in the name of a trustee may be voted by the trustee, in person, by remote communication, or by proxy, but a trustee is not entitled to vote shares held by the trustee without a transfer of the shares into the name of the trustee.

Shares standing in the name of a receiver may be voted by the receiver, and shares held by or under the control of a receiver may be voted by the receiver without a transfer of the shares into the name of the receiver if authority to transfer the shares is contained in an appropriate court order by which the receiver was appointed.

A shareholder whose shares are pledged is entitled to vote the shares until the shares have been transferred into the name of the pledgee, and thereafter the pledgee is entitled to vote the shares so transferred.

Beginning on the date on which written notice of redemption of redeemable shares has been mailed to the holders of the shares and a sum sufficient to redeem the shares has been deposited with a bank or trust company with irrevocable instruction and authority to pay the redemption price to the holders of the shares upon surrender of the certificates for the shares or the uncertificated shares, the shares may not vote on any matter and are not considered to be outstanding shares.

If a corporation adopts rules to provide for voting by proxy executed by electronic transmission or by a ballot cast by electronic transmission, the rules must provide that all legally qualified proxies and ballots cast by electronic transmission may be voted in the same manner as the corporation’s proxy or ballot.

The board may permit shareholders and shareholders’ proxy holders to participate in meetings of the shareholders by remote communication using one or more methods of remote communication, whether the meetings are held at a designated place, by remote communication, or at a designated place and by remote communication. The board may adopt guidelines and procedures that apply to participation in shareholder meetings by remote communication and that the board considers appropriate. The board may limit participation to specified locations or means of communication. A shareholder participating in a meeting by remote communication permitted by the board is considered to be present in person at the meeting.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 23, 24 ch 82 SLA 1989; am §§ 4, 5 ch 103 SLA 2002; am §§ 9 — 13 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

The term “uncertificated” was substituted for “certificateless” in (i) of this section in 1989 to conform to national usage.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (c), in the first sentence of the introductory language, inserted “by remote communication,” following “vote in person,”; in (d), in the first sentence, inserted “ , by remote communication,” following “may vote, in person”, and made a stylistic change; in (f), twice substituted “in person, by remote communication,” for “either in person” preceding “or by proxy”; in (j), inserted “or by a ballot cast by electronic transmission” following “executed by electronic transmission”, “ballots cast by electronic transmission” following “legally qualified proxies”, and “or ballot” following “corporation’s proxy”; added (k).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendments to (c), (d), (f), and (j) of this section and the 2021 enactment of (k) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.421.
Corporation’s acceptance of certain documents.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is entitled to accept the document and give it effect as the act of the shareholder.

If the name signed on a document does not correspond to the name of its shareholder, the corporation, if acting in good faith, is nevertheless entitled to accept the document and give it effect as the act of the shareholder if

the shareholder is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

the name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the document;

the name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the document;

the name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the shareholder and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation or the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder has been presented with respect to the document; or

two or more persons are the shareholder as cotenants or fiduciaries, the name signed purports to be the name of at least one of the coowners, and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coowners.

The corporation is entitled to reject a document if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has a reasonable basis to doubt the validity of the signature on the document or the signatory’s authority to sign for the shareholder.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a document in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the shareholder for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a document under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

In this section, “document” means vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment.

History.

(§ 25 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.423.
Actions taken without meeting: written consent; revocation of consent.

Unless prohibited by the articles or the bylaws, whenever under this chapter shareholders are required or permitted to take action by vote, the action may be taken without a meeting by written consents, identical in content, setting out the action taken, signed by the holders of all outstanding shares entitled to vote on the action.

A shareholder giving a written consent, or the shareholder’s proxy holder, or a transferee of the shares or a personal representative or proxy holder of the shareholder, may only revoke the consent by a writing received by the corporation before the time that written consents of the shares required to authorize the proposed action have been filed with the secretary of the corporation. The revocation is effective upon receipt by the secretary of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.424.
Shareholder agreements.

The shareholders of a corporation may enter into an agreement among all the shareholders to impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of shares of the corporation to

maintain the corporation’s status, including election of S corporation status under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), when the status depends on the number or identity of its shareholders; in this paragraph, “S corporation” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 1361;

preserve exemptions under federal or state securities laws;

ensure that shareholders will be able to control who may participate in the corporation’s business;

ensure that shareholders who wish to retire will be able to liquidate their investments without disrupting corporate affairs;

ensure that estates of deceased shareholders will be able to liquidate the decedents’ shares in the corporation;

obligate the shareholder first to offer to the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

obligate the corporation or other persons, separately, consecutively, or simultaneously, to acquire the restricted shares;

require the corporation, the holder of any class of its shares, or another person, to approve the transfer of restricted shares, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable; and

accomplish another reasonable purpose.

The shareholders of a corporation may enter into an agreement among all of the shareholders to provide for the selection of directors and officers.

The existence of a shareholders’ agreement that is consistent with this section shall be noted conspicuously on the front or back of each stock certificate together with a statement indicating that the agreement, or a copy of the agreement, is on file at the principal office of the corporation and that the corporation will allow inspection of the agreement or furnish a copy of the agreement without charge. If the share has been issued under AS

10.06.349

without a certificate, a statement that discloses the existence of the shareholders’ agreement shall be sent within a reasonable time to the shareholder.

Shares issued before compliance with (c) of this section, if acquired by a person without knowledge of the shareholders’ agreement, are not subject to the shareholders’ agreement.

A shareholders’ agreement may not alter or waive AS

10.06.350

,

10.06.358

,

10.06.360

,

10.06.430

,

10.06.438

,

10.06.544

,

10.06.570

,

10.06.633

,

10.06.648

, or

10.06.653

.

In this section, “shares” includes a security that is convertible into shares or that carries a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

History.

(§ 26 ch 82 SLA 1989)

Sec. 10.06.425.
Voting trusts and agreements among shareholders.

Any number of shareholders of a corporation may create a voting trust for the purpose of conferring upon a trustee or trustees the right to vote or otherwise represent their shares by entering into a written voting trust agreement specifying the terms and conditions of the voting trust, by depositing a copy of the agreement with the corporation at its registered office, and by transferring their shares to the trustee or trustees for the purpose of the agreement. The trustee or trustees shall keep a record of the holders of voting trust certificates evidencing a beneficial interest in the voting trust, giving the names and addresses of all the holders and the number and class of the shares for which the voting trust certificates are issued, and shall deposit a copy of the record with the corporation at its registered office. The copies of the voting trust agreement and the record deposited with the corporation are subject to the same right of examination by a shareholder of the corporation, in person or by agent or attorney, as are the books and records of the corporation under AS

10.06.430

, and the copies of the agreement and the record are subject to examination by a holder of record of voting trust certificates, either in person or by agent or attorney, at a reasonable time for a proper purpose. This subsection does not invalidate an irrevocable proxy complying with AS

10.06.418(e)

.

Shareholders may enter into a voting agreement or any other agreement if the agreement is consistent with this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 27, 28 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 82 SLA 2004)

Collateral references. —

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations, §§ 923 – 965.

Validity of voting trust or other similar agreement for control of voting power of corporate stock. 98 ALR2d 376.

Sec. 10.06.428.
Shareholders’ preemptive rights.

Except to the extent limited or denied by this section or by the articles of incorporation, shareholders have a preemptive right to acquire unissued shares or securities convertible into such shares or carrying a right to subscribe to or acquire shares.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation,

there is no preemptive right

to acquire any shares issued to directors, officers, or employees if approved by the outstanding shares or if authorized by and consistent with a plan previously approved by the outstanding shares; or

to acquire shares sold for consideration other than for cash;

holders of shares of a class that is preferred or limited as to dividends or assets are not entitled to a preemptive right;

holders of shares of common stock are not entitled to a preemptive right to shares of a class that is preferred or limited as to dividends or assets or to any obligations, unless convertible into shares of common stock or carrying a right to subscribe to or acquire shares of common stock;

holders of common stock without voting power are not entitled to a preemptive right to shares of common stock with voting power;

a preemptive right is only an opportunity to acquire shares or other securities under the terms and conditions as the board may fix for the purpose of providing a fair and reasonable opportunity for the exercise of the preemptive right.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.430.
Books and records.

A corporation organized under this chapter shall keep correct and complete books and records of account, minutes of proceedings of its shareholders, board, and committees of the board, and a record of its shareholders, containing the names and addresses of all shareholders and the number and class of the shares held by each. The books and records of account, minutes, and the record of shareholders may be in written form or in any other form capable of being converted into written form within a reasonable time.

A corporation organized under this chapter shall make its books and records of account, or certified copies of them, reasonably available for inspection and copying at the registered office or principal place of business in the state by a shareholder of the corporation. Shareholder inspection shall be upon written demand stating with reasonable particularity the purpose of the inspection. The inspection may be in person or by agent or attorney, at a reasonable time and for a proper purpose. Only books and records of account, minutes, and the record of shareholders directly connected to the stated purpose of the inspection may be inspected or copied.

An officer or agent who, or a corporation that, refuses to allow a shareholder, or the agent or attorney of the shareholder, to examine and make copies from its books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders, for a proper purpose, is liable to the shareholder for a penalty in the amount of 10 percent of the value of the shares owned by the shareholder or $5,000, whichever is greater, in addition to other damages or remedy given the shareholder by law. It is a defense to an action for penalties under this section that the person suing has within two years sold or offered for sale a list of shareholders of the corporation or any other corporation or has aided or abetted a person in procuring a list of shareholders for this purpose, or has improperly used information secured through a prior examination of the books and records of account, minutes, or record of shareholders of the corporation or any other corporation, or was not acting in good faith or for a proper purpose in making the person’s demand.

Nothing in this chapter impairs the power of a court, upon proof by a shareholder of a demand properly made and for a proper purpose, to compel the production for examination by the shareholder of the books and records of account, minutes, and record of shareholders of a corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 29 — 31 ch 82 SLA 1989)